Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,100
Teachers; solicitation by agents or salespersons prohibited; exceptions.

It shall be unlawful for any peddler, agent, salesperson, or representative of any commercial enterprise, theatrical production, or play to call upon or to secure contracts with or solicit orders and business from any classroom teacher while the classroom teacher is actively engaged in the pursuit of his or her work as such. For purposes of this section, a teacher is actively engaged in the pursuit of his or her work between the hours of 8:30 a.m. and 5 p.m. on all days the school in which he or she is teaching is in session. The school board or board of education of any school district may designate such other hours as in their judgment seem best during which the classroom teacher or teachers of the district may be interviewed or solicited by the persons designated in this section.

Laws 1929, c. 86, § 1, p. 339;

C.S.1929, § 79-2133;

R.S.1943, § 79-2141;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 372, p. 815;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1272;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 525.